New York, session 2025-2026, A10797.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 8-b of the court of claims act, as added by chapter 2 1009 of the laws of 1984, subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 210 of the 3 laws of 2007, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 8-b. Claims for unjust conviction and imprisonment. 1. The legisla- 5 ture finds and declares that innocent persons who have been wrongly 6 convicted of crimes and subsequently imprisoned have been frustrated in 7 seeking legal redress due to a variety of substantive and technical 8 obstacles in the law and that such persons should have an available 9 avenue of redress over and above the existing tort remedies to seek 10 compensation for damages. The legislature intends by enactment of the 11 provisions of this section that those innocent persons who can demon- 12 strate by clear and convincing evidence that they were unjustly 13 convicted and imprisoned be able to recover damages against the state. 14 In light of the substantial burden of proof that must be carried by such 15 persons, it is the intent of the legislature that the court, in exercis- 16 ing its discretion as permitted by law regarding the weight and admissi- 17 bility of evidence submitted pursuant to this section, shall, in the 18 interest of justice, give due consideration to difficulties of proof 19 caused by the passage of time, the death or unavailability of witnesses, 20 the destruction of evidence or other factors not caused by such persons 21 or those acting on their behalf. 22 2. Any person convicted and subsequently imprisoned for one or more 23 felonies or misdemeanors against the state which [he] such person did 24 not commit may, under the conditions hereinafter provided, present a 25 claim for damages against the state. In scheduling court appearances and 26 filing deadlines, the court shall give docket priority at each stage of 27 the proceeding to such claims for damages under this subdivision where EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05849-04-6 A. 10797--A 2 1 the claimant asserts proof of innocence through DNA evidence. Any 2 adjournments granted in the course of such a proceeding should be for as 3 short a time as is practicable. 4 3. In order to present the claim for unjust conviction and imprison- 5 ment, claimant must establish by documentary evidence that: 6 (a) [he has] they have been convicted of one or more felonies or 7 misdemeanors against the state and subsequently sentenced to a term of 8 imprisonment, and has served all or any part of the sentence; and 9 (b) (i) [he has] they have been pardoned upon the ground of innocence 10 of the crime or crimes for which [he was] they were sentenced and which 11 are the grounds for the complaint; or (ii) [his] their judgment of 12 conviction was reversed or vacated, and the accusatory instrument 13 dismissed or, if a new trial was ordered, either [he was] they were 14 found not guilty at the new trial or [he was] they were not retried and 15 the accusatory instrument dismissed; provided that the judgement of 16 conviction was reversed or vacated, and the accusatory instrument was 17 dismissed, on any of the following grounds: (A) paragraph (a), (b), (c), 18 (e) or (g) of subdivision one of section 440.10 of the criminal proce- 19 dure law; or (B) subdivision one (where based upon grounds set forth in 20 item (A) hereof), two, three (where the count dismissed was the sole 21 basis for the imprisonment complained of) or five of section 470.20 of 22 the criminal procedure law; or (C) comparable provisions of the former 23 code of criminal procedure or subsequent law; or (D) the statute, or 24 application thereof, on which the accusatory instrument was based 25 violated the constitution of the United States or the state of New York; 26 or they have had one or more felonies and misdemeanors dismissed with 27 prejudice following serving all or part of the sentence; and 28 (c) [his] their claim is not time-barred by the provisions of subdivi- 29 sion seven of this section. 30 4. The claim shall state facts in sufficient detail to permit the 31 court to find that claimant is likely to succeed at trial in proving 32 that (a) [he] they did not commit any of the acts charged in the accusa- 33 tory instrument or conviction or [his] their acts or omissions charged 34 in the accusatory instrument or conviction did not constitute a felony 35 or misdemeanor against the state, and (b) [he] they did not by [his] 36 their own conduct cause or bring about [his] their conviction. The claim 37 shall be verified by the claimant. If the court finds after reading the 38 claim that claimant is not likely to succeed at trial, it shall dismiss 39 the claim, either on its own motion or on the motion of the state. 40 5. In order to obtain a judgment in [his] their favor, claimant must 41 prove by clear and convincing evidence that: 42 (a) [he has] they have been convicted of one or more felonies or 43 misdemeanors against the state and subsequently sentenced to a term of 44 imprisonment, and has served all or any part of the sentence; and 45 (b) (i) [he has] they have been pardoned upon the ground of innocence 46 of the crime or crimes for which [he was] they were sentenced and which 47 are the grounds for the complaint; or (ii) [his] their judgment of 48 conviction was reversed or vacated, and the accusatory instrument 49 dismissed or, if a new trial was ordered, either [he was] they were 50 found not guilty at the new trial or [he was] they were not retried and 51 the accusatory instrument dismissed; provided that the judgement of 52 conviction was reversed or vacated, and the accusatory instrument was 53 dismissed, on any of the following grounds: (A) paragraph (a), (b), (c), 54 (e) or (g) of subdivision one of section 440.10 of the criminal proce- 55 dure law; or (B) subdivision one (where based upon grounds set forth in 56 item (A) hereof), two, three (where the count dismissed was the sole A. 10797--A 3 1 basis for the imprisonment complained of) or five of section 470.20 of 2 the criminal procedure law; or (C) comparable provisions of the former 3 code of criminal procedure or subsequent law; or (D) the statute, or 4 application thereof, on which the accusatory instrument was based 5 violated the constitution of the United States or the state of New York; 6 or they have had one or more felonies and misdemeanors dismissed with 7 prejudice following serving all or part of the sentence; and 8 (c) [he] they did not commit any of the acts charged in the accusatory 9 instrument or conviction that caused their incarceration or [his] their 10 acts or omissions charged in the accusatory instrument or conviction did 11 not constitute a felony or misdemeanor against the state; and 12 (d) [he] they did not by [his] their own conduct cause or bring about 13 [his] their conviction by pleading guilty to the crime that caused their 14 incarceration. 15 6. If the court finds that the claimant is entitled to a judgment, it 16 shall award damages in such sum of money as the court determines will 17 fairly and reasonably compensate [him] them. 18 7. Any person claiming compensation under this section based on a 19 pardon that was granted before the effective date of this section or the 20 dismissal of an accusatory instrument or conviction that occurred before 21 the effective date of this section shall file [his] their claim within 22 [two] five years after the effective date of this section. Any person 23 claiming compensation under this section based on a pardon that was 24 granted on or after the effective date of this section or the dismissal 25 of an accusatory instrument or conviction that occurred on or after the 26 effective date of this section shall file [his] their claim within [two] 27 five years after the pardon or dismissal. 28 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.